District of Columbia statutes.
7-1501.01

“Human body parts” defined; prohibited acts.

(a)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “human body parts” means any portion of a living human body, including, but not limited to, organs, tissues, eyes, bones, veins, and arteries, except that the term shall not mean hair and blood.

(b)

It is unlawful for any person in the District of Columbia to buy, to offer to buy, to sell, to offer to sell, or to procure through purchase any human body part for any reason, including, but not limited to, medical and specific uses, such as transplantation, implantation, infusion, or injection.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-189, § 2, 32 DCR 931
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 30(c), 55 DCR 2532
1981 Ed., § 6-2601.
D.C. Law 17-145, in subsec. (a), substituted “a living human body” for “a human body”.